dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
SFX xU èser esèndo/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, veronexe
SFX xU èser esèndo-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + n[dt]o, veronexe
SFX xU èser esendo/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o
SFX xU èser esendo-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + n[dt]o
SFX xU èser esando/P0P1A0 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, metaplaxmo
SFX xU èser esando-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, metaplaxmo
SFX xU èser esento/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, pavan
SFX xU èser esento-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + n[dt]o, pavan
SFX xU èser esanto/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
SFX xU èser esanto-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
SFX xU èser esande/P0P1P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T2 + n[dt]o, liventin
